Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.720

Payment of benefits—Restraining orders.

A party to a dissolution proceeding may file a motion with the court requesting the court to enter an order restraining the department from paying any benefits to a member until further order of the court. The department shall not initiate payment of benefits to a member from the time a restraining order is served on the department until the court enters a further order disposing of the benefits.

[ 1991 c 365 s 25.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.